Maine, session 132, LD814.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §5114, sub-§2, ¶G, as amended by PL 2015, c. 332, §1, is further
amended to read:
G. Any other services necessary for the general well-being of older persons; or
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §5114, sub-§2, ¶H, as enacted by PL 2015, c. 332, §2, is
amended to read:
H. Services designed to assist older persons with maintaining their financial
independence and avoiding financial exploitation, including personal financial
management assistance.; or
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §5114, sub-§2, ¶I is enacted to read:
I. Case management and navigation services in accordance with the federal 1987 Older
Americans Act, 42 United States Code, as amended.
Sec. 4. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Office of Aging and Disability Services Central Office 0140
Initiative: Provides ongoing funding to address unmet needs of older adults through
community-based services and programs delivered by the area agency in each of the State's
coordinated community program areas. The appropriation must be distributed to the area
agencies, based on priorities identified by local advisory councils to meet regional needs,
through the intrastate funding formula to develop programs and deliver services necessary
for the general well-being of older adults, including, but not limited to, in-home services,
case management services, meals programs, wellness services, respite for caregivers,
public education and outreach, volunteer services and information and referral services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $9,750,000 $9,750,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $9,750,000 $9,750,000